Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Article 3. Bonds.

§ 31-25-101.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Bank” means the Mississippi Development Bank created pursuant to Section 31-25-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes and any other evidence of indebtedness.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Emergency fund” means the Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund created under Section 49-17-86.

“Revolving fund” means the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created under Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 31-25-103.
Deposits into revolving fund; agreements; security; pledge of payments; recordation; enforcement of interest; resolution.

The commission acting through the department is hereby authorized, in connection with the issuance of bonds by the Mississippi Development Bank, to provide funds to deposit into the revolving fund and to enter into agreements pursuant to which such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal, premium, if any, and interest, from such of the income, proceeds, revenues and funds from time to time in or payable into the revolving fund as shall be specified in such agreement. In the discretion of the commission, such bonds may be further secured by a mortgage, trust agreement, trust indenture or assignment among the bank, the commission and a trustee, which trustee (and any depository specified in any mortgage, trust agreement or assignment) shall be such persons or corporations as the bank or the commission shall designate, including nonresidents of Mississippi and banks and trust companies incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of other states of the United States, which nonresident banks or trust companies may enter into such mortgages, trust agreements and assignments and perform all obligations under and related to such mortgages, trust agreements and assignments without being required to qualify to do business in the State of Mississippi, or to make any filings or take any other action as a result of acting as trustee under any applicable laws of the State of Mississippi and regardless of whether they shall have so qualified or made such filings or taken such action. Such agreement, trust indenture, assignment or mortgage may include any provisions authorized pursuant to Section 31-25-39, any other covenants deemed necessary to make such bonds secure and marketable and such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, but without limitation, covenants regarding: the application of the bond proceeds and the procedures therefor; the pledging, application and securing of the income, proceeds, revenues, funds, property or other collateral (or any combination thereof) pledged to the repayment of such bonds; the creation and maintenance of reserves; the investment of funds; the issuance of additional bonds for any authorized purposes which shall be secured by the income, proceeds, revenues, funds, property or other collateral (or any combination thereof) pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein; the operation and maintenance of facilities; accounts and audits; the sale of properties; remedies of bondholders; requirements for local participation or funding of part of the costs of projects from other sources; limitations on the percentage of costs of a project which may be paid with loans from the revolving fund; maximum amounts for any loan from the revolving fund; interest rates, methods for computing interest rates, or criteria to be applied in determining interest rates, with respect to loans; maximum terms for loans; criteria applicable to determining amortization schedules for loans; requirements for a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of loans; conditions under which proceeds of a loan may be used to purchase or refinance existing debt obligations; other criteria applicable to determining eligibility for a loan; the vesting in a trustee or trustees of such powers and rights as may be necessary to secure the bonds and the income, proceeds, revenues, funds, property or other collateral (or any combination thereof) from which they are payable; the terms and conditions upon which bondholders may exercise their rights and remedies; the definition of an event of default; and the consequences and remedies upon the occurrence of an event of default, including without limitations, the exercise by or on behalf of the bondholders of rights of secured parties under the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code or otherwise generally available to secured parties or the appointment of a receiver, by any court of competent jurisdiction, to administer any properties and facilities pledged thereunder, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities or commodities or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing the receiver, and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding, or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of the bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the mortgage, assignment, trust indenture or other instrument. The powers herein granted may be exercised whether or not a trust agreement is entered into and, if no trust agreement is entered into, such provisions as are above authorized may be set out in a resolution of the commission or an agreement between the commission and the bank.

All income, proceeds, revenues, funds, property or other collateral (or any combination thereof) pledged to the payment of such bonds shall be subject to a lien in favor of the holders of such bonds, and all such income, proceeds, revenues, funds, property or other collateral (or any combination thereof) shall be immediately subject to such lien without any physical delivery thereof or further act by the bank, the commission or the state and such lien shall be effective as against all parties asserting claims against the bank, the commission, the state or any agency thereof, whether by way of tort, contract or otherwise, whether or not such parties may have had notice of such lien. The mortgages, assignments, trust indentures or other instruments creating such pledge need not be filed or recorded except in the official minutes of the State Bond Commission.

Monies in the revolving fund shall be subject to such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in any agreement or resolution referred to in subsection (1) of this section or any agreements executed in connection with any guarantees, bond insurance, letters of credit or other credit enhancements relating to such bonds.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this article or of any interest coupons appertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under any agreement, or under any resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this article to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

Any resolution relating to the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this article shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the bank, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular, special or recessed meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this article, or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued pursuant to this article shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose.

The state does hereby covenant with the holders of any such bonds that it will not, while any such bonds shall be outstanding, limit or diminish the right and power of any political subdivision to establish, maintain and collect rates, fees, rentals and other charges pledged to the payment of such bonds, or the power of the commission to fulfill any covenants made with such bondholders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 522, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 31-25-105.
Establishment of debt service reserve funds; disposition of moneys in funds; reserve requirements; appropriations for funds.

In addition to any other funds it may establish, the Mississippi Development Bank may, by resolution, establish one or more special funds pursuant to this section, referred to herein as “debt service reserve funds,” and may pay into such debt service reserve funds:

Any monies appropriated and made available by the state for the purposes of such debt service reserve funds;

Any proceeds from the sale of notes or bonds to the extent provided in the resolutions of the bank authorizing the issuance thereof; and

Any monies which may be made available to the bank from any other sources for the purposes of such debt service reserve funds.

So long as there are bonds outstanding secured by a debt service reserve fund created by this section, all monies held in any debt service reserve fund, except as otherwise permitted in this section, shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of the bonds or of the sinking fund payments mentioned in this section with respect to such bonds, the purchase or redemption of such bonds, the payment of interest on such bonds, or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity; except that monies in any such funds shall not be withdrawn at any time in such amount as would reduce such fund to less than the debt service reserve fund requirement, except for the purpose of making with respect to such bonds principal, interest, redemption premium and sinking fund payments for the payment of which other monies of the bank are not available. Except to the extent monies in a debt service reserve fund are needed to satisfy a debt service reserve fund requirement, the amounts on deposit in such debt service reserve fund may be used for any corporate purposes of the bank in accordance with state and federal laws.

The bank may provide by resolution for the establishment of a debt service reserve fund requirement for any debt service reserve fund established pursuant to this section.

The chairman of the bank shall, on or before January 1 of each year, make and deliver to the Governor of the state his certificate, stating the sum, if any, required to restore each debt service reserve fund to the debt service reserve fund requirement. The Governor shall transmit to the State Legislature a request for the amount, if any, required to restore each debt service reserve fund to the debt service reserve fund requirement. The State Legislature may, but shall not be required to, make any such appropriations so requested. All sums appropriated by the State Legislature for such restoration and paid shall be deposited by the bank in each such debt service reserve fund. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4), nothing provided in this section shall create or constitute a debt or liability of the state. Bonds issued by the bank under Section 31-25-21(k) for the purposes provided in Section 31-25-20(g) shall be general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.

The bank may create such other funds as may be necessary or desirable for the corporate purposes of the bank including debt service reserve funds not established pursuant to this section.

Any monies appropriated by the State Legislature for the purposes of any of the debt service reserve funds established pursuant to this section shall not revert to the General Fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 522, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved February 24, 1997).

§ 31-25-107.
Joint legislative committee.

There is hereby created, for the purposes of oversight and review, a joint legislative committee to be comprised of six (6) members, three (3) to be appointed by the Speaker of the House from the membership of the Mississippi House of Representatives, one (1) from each Supreme Court district, as such districts existed on January 1, 1989, and three (3) to be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the Mississippi Senate, one (1) from each Supreme Court district, as such districts existed on January 1, 1989. The committee shall provide oversight and review of all bond transactions authorized by this article and shall render any necessary advice in order to accomplish the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 522, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).